Jeff Bezos merely wants Amazon.com to be Earth's biggest seller of everything.
Jeff Bezos loves being on the move.
He sits in the back of a white van, beaming as usual, surrounded by a team of assistants from Amazon.com, the Web's biggest retail store and, someday, if Bezos gets it right, Earth's Biggest Store.
The van is driving through Coffeyville, a small town on the Kansas prairie named after James A. Coffey, who set up a grand trading post there in 1860 on the old frontier.
Today's new frontier is comprised of the interconnected wires, routers and computers of the Net.
The possibilities for trade on this frontier are far more fabulous than anyone could ever have been imagined 100 - or even 10 - years ago.
That's where Bezos comes in.
His van speeds down a two-lane road and pulls up to the biggest warehouse you've ever seen.
We've arrived at Amazon's giant Coffeyville Distribution Center, and Bezos (pronounced Bay-zos), who's never been here before, is giggling with excitement.
Here in Coffeyville is another piece of the proof that Bezos' early and fervent belief in the commercial potential of the Internet stands as one of the more prescient assumptions ever made by a businessperson.
This giant 850,000 square-foot warehouse is stocked with books, CDs, TVs, stereos, video games, software, and toys.
Yet only 10% of the building's floor area is being used.
The rest is space to grow, here for the ongoing e-commerce revolution.
BEZOS' REVOLUTION
If all goes according to his daring plan, this warehouse will be filled to capacity within the next few years and will handle everything: washing machines, cars, medicines, exercise machines, marmalade, model airplanes, everything except firearms and certain live animals.
You name it, Amazon.com will sell it.
Jeffrey Preston Bezos is trying to assemble Earth's biggest selection of consumer goods, and put them on his website for people to find and buy.
And now he's adding services too, such as banking, insurance, and travel.
It's incredibly risky.
How important is the Amazon brand name?
Another question... how long can his investor's money hold out?
Bezos has already burned through a fortune in cash with no sign of slowing down.
According to estimates, the company's net loss was approximately $350 million last year alone.
The e-commerce world has changed since July, 1995, when Amazon was born.
Many other giant e-commerce warehouses now specialize in selling an overwhelming selection, great prices and high quality service for a particular category of goods.
Adornis.com features luxury items, for instance, and Petopia.com is one of dozens of sites for owners of pets.
Today, traditional retailers such as Wal-Mart are making the transition to the Web too.
And one of Amazon's most aggressive competitors, eBay, has been profitable from Day One using its website as one big auction.
As these competitive websites put pressure on Amazon's growth Bezos is adding categories as fast as he can.
During 1999, he added video games and DVD movies, toys, electronics, software, home-improvement products, auctions and zShops - an online flea market where anyone can sell anything.
Amazon Inc. has also acquired other established Internet sales companies such as Drugstore.com, Pets.com, HomeGrocer.com, and Gear.com.
But how long can you build warehouses to the sky and not fill them?
Says Scott Sipprelle, founding partner of the investment firm Midtown Research Group: "The chance of a painful failure goes up as the company grows, while debt is going up, margins are going down and loss of available cash is increasing."
However, most analysts think that Amazon will succeed over the next few years.
Total sales approached an estimated $1 billion in 1999.
"We firmly believe," says Salomon Smith Barney's Holly Becker, "that Wall Street will realize Amazon's foresight in developing one of the smartest strategies in business history."
Bezos is convinced that as more customers come to his site, he'll be able to offer the lowest prices to do the best job of helping them find stuff.
But what if people use his site for their shopping research, then go elsewhere for the cheapest price?
Bezos suggests a possible solution:"Membership clubs!" he says.
"If you want to see all the product information we collect on Amazon-all the previous customer comments and professional reviews - you have to pay $30 a year."
Those membership fees would be used to help drive down the price of items, which would be sold almost at cost.
Nonmembers could shop there, of course.
They just wouldn't have access to Amazon's rich data for helping their choices.
Bezos and; Co. has developed an entirely new way of thinking about the ancient art of selling products, managing employees and satisfying customers.
For instance, the company created an Internet "Flow experience" that keeps customers coming back to Amazon's website to read product reviews or one another's "wish lists."
This new way of thinking is also visible in the Coffeyville warehouse, one of a network of distribution centers specifically designed to handle e-commerce.
Huge banners festoon the warehouse walls listing the company's Six Core Values ("customer obsession, ownership, bias for action, frugality, high hiring bar and innovation").
As a person, Bezos is pathologically happy and enthusiastic.
Today's visit to Coffeyville is typical.
As usual he's smiling, shaking hands and shocking new employees with his distinctive laugh, a rapid honk that sounds like a flock of geese.
He's an average-size man with warm brown eyes who typically wears simple white or blue button-down shirts, khakis and no tie.
During our tour of the plant he runs into a huge room filled with 300 new employees who leap to their feet as he enters.
They give him a standing ovation.
"Thank you!" says Bezos.
"Let me say, THANK YOU for WORKING HERE!"
And he laughs that startling laugh.
He launches into a speech about his Six Core Values.
He always begins with the watchword of his faith: the customer comes first.
"Wake up every morning terrified - not of the competition but of our customers."
Lots of hands shoot up during the Q. and A. period which goes on for 15 minutes.
What does your house look like?
(It's lovely, and we are amazingly fortunate to live there, he replies.)
Just how many items do we sell?
(Eighteen million, so far.)
He answers them all, patiently and directly.
Finally, a woman in the front asks, "Can I have your autograph?"
Workers suddenly get up and encircle Bezos, handing him hats, dollar bills, scraps of paper - anything - for his signature.
Welcome to Bezosville, U.S.A
The Bezos family can trace its American roots to frontier people whose role in life was that of risk taker, exploring the unknown.
His mom's great grandfather, Bernhardt Vesper, acquired a 25,000-acre ranch in Cotulla, in southern Texas.
Jeff would spend summers there with his grandparents, Lawrence Preston ("Pop") Gise and his wife Mattie Louise Strait.
Little Jeff's favorite relative, Pop Gise worked in New Mexico as a senior manager in the Atomic Energy Commission before retiring to the Cotulla ranch.
Jeff's mother Jackie Gise, as smart, headstrong and pioneering as anyone in the clan, married young and gave birth to Jeff on Jan. 12, 1964, when she was 17.
The marriage lasted about a year.
Jeff has neither memory of nor interest in his biological father.
"I've never been curious about him.
My real father is the guy who raised me. "
That guy is Mike Bezos, a Cuban refugee who moved to the U.S. by himself when he was 15 years old, with nothing more than two shirts and a pair of pants.
Taken under wing by a Catholic mission, Mike learned English, toiled at many odd jobs and made his way to the University of Albuquerque.
While working the night shift as a clerk at a bank, he met Jackie Gise, who was also employed there, and fell in love.
They married when Jeff was four.
Mike eventually became an engineer with Exxon, and moved to Miami.
Jeff was an exceptionally smart child.
Fed up with sleeping in a crib, the toddler found a screwdriver and reduced his jail to its component parts.
He constantly built models, and tinkered with an electronics kit that Pop bought him.
When his little sister Christina and little brother Mark became old enough to get into Jeff's bedroom, he rigged a buzzer to his door that would go off like a burglar alarm.
Later the family garage became his laboratory.
In high school in Miami Jeff became the valedictorian.
He didn't drink, do drugs or even swear.
People liked him anyway.
Almost every summer, he headed for his grandfather's ranch in Texas where he'd ride horses, brand cattle, fix windmills and help his grandpa keep an old Caterpillar tractor operating.
Today Bezos names two pioneers as his heroes: Thomas Edison and Walt Disney.
The former was a brilliant innovator and a horrid businessman, the latter a good innovator and a great businessman.
It wasn't Disney's movies that impressed Bezos but his theme parks.
He went to Disney World six times.
"The thing that always amazed me was how powerful Disney's vision was," Bezos says.
"He knew exactly what he wanted to build, teamed up with a bunch of really smart people and built it.
Everyone thought it wouldn't work, and he had to persuade the banks to lend him $400 million.
But he did it. "
AMAZON'S SOURCE
On one day in May, 1994, 30-year-old Jeff Bezos was sitting at the computer in his office in New York.
He worked for D.E. Shaw, an unusual research company founded by a former professor of computer science at Columbia University, Dr. David Shaw.
The firm specialized in computer-based quantitative analysis to spot emerging trends in business and the stock market.
Bezos had a project to explore the still immature Internet and hunt for business potential.
When he discovered that the Internet was growing at a rate of 2,300% a year, he was stunned.
Bezos had graduated from Princeton University, majoring in electrical engineering and computer science.
He worked in various financial services companies for four years before he got an interview at Shaw.
After specializing in the analysis of new business opportunities in the insurance business, his work at Shaw shifted to the study of the emerging Internet boom.
When he started to consider business opportunities on the Internet, Bezos decided to research mail-order companies.
Figuring that things that sold well by mail would do well online, he made a list of the Top 20 mail-order products and looked for where he could create "the most value for customers."
Value, in his equation, would be something customers craved: vast selection, say, or convenience or low prices.
And that's what ultimately led him on one day in May, 1994, to the idea of selling books on the Internet.
There weren't any huge mail-order book catalogs simply because a giant catalog containing thousands of listings would need to be as large and heavy as a phone book-too expensive to mail.
That, of course, made it perfect for the Internet, which is the ideal container for limitless information.
When he learned that book information was already well organized by major wholesalers on CD-ROMs, he realized it could be put online quite easily.
Bezos realized he desperately wanted to start his own online bookstore.
His wife MacKenzie, an English literature graduate of Princeton, was all for the adventure.
Bezos went to his boss, Dr. Shaw, who said he understood Bezos' desire to quit and start his own business.
On the advice of Shaw, however, Bezos spent the next two days considering the risks.
He imagined that he was 80 years old and looking back at his life.
He knew he wouldn't regret having tried to build an online business and failed.
"In fact, I knew that if I didn't try this, I would regret it."
An experienced quantitative analyst, Bezos figured that the average Net start-up had a 1 in 10 chance of success; he gave himself a 30% chance.
"That's actually a very liberating expectation, expecting to fail," he says.
He told his first investors - family and friends: "I think there's a 70% chance you're going to lose all your money, so don't invest unless you can afford to lose it."
Jeff's father, Mike Bezos, initially questioned his son's idea of quitting a cushy job to start a company that would probably fail.
But his parents trusted him and believed in him every moment of his life.
"We didn't invest in Amazon, we invested in Jeff."
That investment totaled $300,000, a huge chunk of the money they had saved for retirement.
Today, as 6% owners of the company, they're billionaires.
On July 4, 1994, Jeff and MacKenzie moved to Seattle - a city filled with the kinds of Net-savvy people he'd need to hire.
The most important person Bezos hired was probably the first: Shel Kaphan, a brilliant programmer in Santa Clara, Calif., and veteran of a dozen start-ups, many of them, in fact, failures.
He moved to Seattle to work in the computer-filled garage of the modest two-bedroom home that Jeff and MacKenzie had rented in Bellevue, a Seattle suburb.
Bezos named his tiny, garage-based company Amazon, Inc. after the seemingly endless South American river.
By June 1995 a rudimentary website had been created on a hidden site and Beta-tested successfully by 300 friends and family members.
Kaphan's code was simple and elegant, allowing pages to be delivered without delay.
So on July 16, 1995, Amazon.com opened its site to the world.
Bezos simply told all 300 Beta testers to spread the word.
During the first 30 days, without any attention in the press, Amazon sold books in all 50 states and 45 other countries.
The company grew and grew and grew.
In May 1996, a Wall Street Journal story about Amazon introduced Amazon to a whole new stream of customers.
It also caught the attention of rivals like national bookstore chains Barnes and; Noble and the Borders Group, which hadn't yet moved online.
Barnesandnoble.com would appear a year later - just before Amazon's IPO, which went off at a modest $18 a share.
At first Wall Street analysts were afraid of the threat posed by the giant bookstores chains, but Barnesandnoble.com did nothing to slow Amazon's amazing sales.
The stock began to move too, propelling Bezos' personal wealth into the tens of millions, then into the hundreds of millions.
And then, when analyst Henry Blodget, now with Merrill Lynch, said he believed Amazon was a $400-a-share company, Bezos became another Rockefeller.
At the end of 1999 his shares were worth $10.5 billion.
Bezos has cashed in less than $25 million worth of his stock, but that's enough to live well on, come what may.
Bezos does not talk about his wealth or whether Amazon will be successful.
Instead, he talks about a higher level of consumer service, in which you ll come to Amazon, and the one product you're been looking for all your life will be featured on the website that day.
You may not even know product even exists, but since the Amazon site is so familiar with your consumption habits, it knows, and offers the product to you.
If the world goes his way, Bezos could become even richer than his Seattle neighbor Bill Gates.
Then what?
"At some point," he says, giving MacKenzie a hug as the two of them stand around in the kitchen, "we want to figure out how to do philanthropic work effectively, which will require at least as much attention and energy as building a successful company."
He says the trick to solving some of the world's problems is to think, Amazon-like, in the long term.
"Say you want to solve world hunger.
If you think in terms of a five-year time frame, you get really depressed; it's an intractable problem.
But if you say, well, let's see how we could solve this in 100 years - it's a problem because you'll be dead by then, but the solution becomes more tractable. "
"Anyway," he adds quickly, self-deprecatingly, in probably the same way he told people his start-up had only a 30% chance of success, "It'll be a long time before we build Amazon into a lasting company."
And then he laughs and laughs and laughs.
What happens when you place an order at Amazon.com
You order three items online, and a computer in Seattle takes charge
A computer assigns your order - a book, a game and a digital camera - to one of Amazon's seven U.S. huge regional distribution centers.
In a regional center, three red lights go on Your order goes to the closest distribution warehouse to you that stocks your products.
A worker retrieves an item from the warehouse shelf above a little red light showing a product being ordered.
Computers determine which workers go where.
Your items are put into crates on moving belts Each item goes into a large green crate containing many customers' orders that rides a series of conveyor belts for several miles through the huge plant.
Machines scan the bar code on each item and by many of the distribution facility's several hundred workers.
All three items converge in a chute, and then inside a box All of the crates arrive at a central point where bar codes are matched with order numbers to determine who gets what.
Your three items end up in a 3-ft.-wide chute and are placed into a cardboard box with a new bar code that identifies your order.
Any gifts you've chosen are wrapped by hand Amazon trains an elite group of gift wrappers who each process 30 packages an hour.
Amazon's warehouses are stocked with 4.4 million yards of ribbon and 7.8 million sq. ft. of wrapping paper.
The box containing your three items is packed, taped, weighed and labeled before leaving the warehouse in a truck.
An Amazon distribution warehouse can ship as many as 200,000 pieces a day.
About 60% of orders are shipped via the U.S. Postal Service;
UPS ships nearly everything else.
Products weighing 150 lbs. or more require special delivery.
It's time to shape up: Europeans are facing an obesity crisis that may only get worse The teenagers are clustered around lunch tables, wolfing down heaps of beans on toast or pasta with a spicy eggplant sauce, buttering their bread, peeling oranges.
These kids are refueling.
It is midway through week five of a six-week sports camp, and they have spent the morning running and doing basketball drills.
That - along with the fact that they are, after all, teenagers-means they are hungry.
Based at Leeds Metropolitan University, the Carnegie International Camp is Britain's first summer weight-loss program for children, and their counselors know exactly how many calories are on those lunch plates.
Some 40 boys and girls, 11 to 17, pay $550 a week to be put on monitored meal plans, attend nutrition classes, have their body fat measured and, every day, exercise until they are ready to drop - or at least feign knee injuries.
All of these kids had to be around 35% above the World Health Organization's mean recommended weight to be accepted and chose to spend their summer vacations this way.
It is nice, some of the campers say, to be someplace where they are not outcasts: where some of them, for the first time ever, can make friends, go on dates, and get special attention in sports classes, rather than get chosen last.
By summer's end the weight losses were not dramatic.
Most campers shed around two kg a week.
That slow, steady loss, rather than some dramatic disappearance of pounds that will reappear by Christmas, is exactly what Paul Gately, the camp's founder and a lecturer in exercise physiology and health at the university, intended.
"The main aim is to encourage them to be active and competent andlsqb; at sports andrsqb;, and then they'll get confident," he says.
"And if you get them early you can prevent diseases later in life."
In our weight-obsessed society, it is sometimes easy to forget that more than a cosmetic issue fat is also a pressing health concern.
Gately is a member a small European community of health and medical professionals who are focusing on one of the regions' most serious and most misunderstood ealth problems: obesity.
Obesity is defined by WHO as a body mass index (BMI) - one's weight in kilograms divided by the square of one's height in meters - equal to or greater than 30.
A person 1.78-m tall and tipping the scales at 125 kg, for example, would have a BMI of 39.5, definitely obese.
It is a risk factor for a wide range of serious medical conditions, including diabetes, heart disease, stoke, certain forms of cancer, gall bladder disease and joint problems.
America remains the fattest developed country, with 20% or male and 25% of female adults clinically obese.
But almost one-third of people living in the European Union are now overweight and one in 10 is obese.
These numbers have shot up between 10 and 40% in the last decade alone, depending on the country.
Last year the British, with 17% of male and 20% of female adults obese, pulled ahead of the Germans to become Europe's fattest people.
Twenty years ago, only about 7% of the British population was obese.
WHO estimates that in some European countries close to 10% of schoolchildren are obese, while one long-term study of German schoolchildren shows their obesity rates doubling in the last 20 years.
Even in Europe's slimmest nations, such as France, Italy and Sweden, the trend curves just keep getting curvier.
In America, the latest estimates show that healthcare costs for obese adults are $238 billion annually.
Even that staggering figure does not take into account the costly losses of employees' productivity due to problems related to obesity.
Germany is one of the few European nations beginning to calculate the price of this epidemic, and the numbers are sobering.
According to a 1993 report by the German Health Ministry, around $179 million is spent on obesity treatment each year.
Another $177 million goes to the temporary disability of obesity patients.
Another 1998 report by German obesity expert Alfred Wirth, a professor of internal medicine and senior physician at Teutoburgerwald Clinic in Bad Tothenfelde, calculates that $19.4 billion is spent on the treatment of illness which can arise from obesity.
That figure represents 6% of the overall expenses of the German health system.
Yet no European governments are tackling the obesity problem with either a public health campaign or research.
Despite the glittering promise of new diet drugs and the proliferation of fat-free foods and miracle potions, the fundamental strategies for treating the condition have barely changed in the past two decades.
The usual old belief, put simply, is that to lose weight one must expend more energy than one consumes.
Put even more simply: eat less, exercise more.
However, meeting the challenge of obesity is not all that simple.
"The nature of the physical demands on people at work and in the home has been completely transformed in recent decades," says Professor Philip James, chairman of the International Obesity Task Force and one of Britain's leading anti-obesity advocates.
"As we drop our physical activity but maintain the nature of our diet, it's an absolutely gorgeous combination for making us fat."
Without dramatic shifts in lifestyle, there may be no turning back.
Indeed, some people have already given up.
In the UK some high street shops are simply resizing women's clothing to keep more women in the "average" zone.
And in the US the food industry is developing snacks that people can eat with one hand, that is, snacks for people to eat while driving a car.
Europe is not quite that bad-yet.
But fast food is fast encroaching.
In the UK the number of fast food outlets doubled between 1984 and 1999, and even in France, a new McDonald's opens every five days.
In Rome, there's a Dunkin Donuts in sight of the Trevi Fountain, and McDonald's Italian revenues soared 27% in 1998 over the previous year.
Throughout Europe, "American-size" portions or all-you-can-eat buffets are becoming popular, along with a greater emphasis on packaged and prepared foods.
Dr. Susan Jebb, head of the nutrition and health section at the British Medical Research Council's Centre for Human Nutrition Research, cautions that it is misleading to pin the blame for obesity on fast food, which like most other things is perfectly fine to eat in moderation.
In fact, some studies show that average calorie consumption has actually declined in the past two decades.
"What people don't recognize is the decline in energy expenditure," says Jebb.
Despite the dramatic rise in obesity and its public and personal costs, the condition has traditionally been a difficult one to treat, beginning with the fact that it has not always even been recognized as a problem.
When he first became interested in the subject in the 1970s, says James, "This was a completely uncharted field as far as the international community was concerned.
Everybody thought I was talking nonsense. "
Even now, he says, many doctors are still trained to treat diseases themselves, rather than look to the root causes, and there is no medically recognized specialty in the field.
Obesity also presents a problem of perception: many people regard it as the domain of lazy slobs who eat too much.
"There's a lot of prejudice around obesity from health professionals and employers," say Lyndel Costain, a dietician and spokesperson for the British Dietetic Association.
"It's seen as self-inflicted."
Health workers and patients confirm this.
"Many fat people are discriminated against, because people see them as weak-willed," says Elly Jeurissen, a statistician and fat-acceptance advocate in the Netherlands.
By the time patients arrive at the obesity unit at Huddinge University Hospital in Sweden, everything else has failed them, according to Christina Persson, a nurse in the day-care program there.
"They've been badly treated by the health system and feel like no one has listened," she says.
"GPs have no time.
They say, 'Okay, you're fat, you have to lose weight.' even if it's someone who needs therapy."
Or other medical help.
"I've heard such bad stories, you can't imagine," says Paul Rooth, a doctor at the unit.
"I had a woman last Christmas-her GP referred her.
She'd been complaining about heaviness in her lower abdomen.
It turned out she had ovarian cancer, and she died three months later. "
Another difficulty lies in the various types and causes of obesity.
Scientists are just beginning to unravel the genetic components of obesity and the intricate workings of hunger and satiety.
"We have to ask ourselves why some people can eat a lot and remain slim," says Dieter Johnsen, a nutrition expert at the German Institute for Nutrition Research, "While others get fat though they eat normally."
But so far only three gene defects that actually cause obesity have been isolated-two of which involve leptin, a hormone that acts as a sort of fat brake in the brain-and those mutations have been discovered among only a handful of people.
In the meantime, the gene pools across Europe have not changed nearly as dramatically as the rise in obesity.
"There is undoubtedly a genetic susceptibility, "says Jebb.
"But what allows that susceptibility to manifest itself is a combination of behavioral and environmental factors."
Doctors who work with obese patients compare many of them to alcoholics or drug addicts, perhaps eating compulsively because of ingrained psychological problems.
"But in contrast to other addictive behaviors, where zero intake is the target, you still need to eat to survive," says Professor Stephan Rossner, director of the Huddinge obesity unit and president of the International Association for the Study of Obesity.
"The much harder task is to use these things in moderation."
Rossner has that a treatment that works for one person may have disastrous and discouraging results for another.
"We can't predict what will work," he says.
"To tell women who are obese because of childhood abuse to go exercise is useless.
And former elite athletes (who still eat as if they were in training) don't need to talk about their childhoods. "
Rossner is taking an equally holistic approach to treating obesity at his clinic in Stockholm.
The clinic, which has an annual budget of less than $500,000 and logs 3000 patient visits a year, is cash-strapped and relies on pharmaceutical companies for grants.
They are also working on a range of other studies into hunger and satiety, and are training others to treat obesity in the field.
They see people through a rigorous 12-week day-care program, combining aspects of behavioral therapy with such basics as teaching the patients how to prepare breakfast.
But ask the members of the unit what they would like to see in terms of treatment, and they all say, "More."
The new obesity drugs may work for some; bariatric surgery - in which the stomach is surgically reduced - can help those most severely obese; extended counseling combined with a diet and exercise regime can be the answer for others.
But above all, obesity treatment must go hand in hand with a public health initiative, and this, many people believe, can only come from governments.
Costain of the British Dietetic Association would like to see more education through media and health outlets about the importance of physical activity, and sweeping changes in schools and the workplace.
At work, for instance, Costain supports the idea of making showers available for employees who want to exercise at lunchtime and the practice of offering a healthier range of food in company cafeterias.
Finland, which has some of the heaviest people in Europe - offers an excellent example of what can be done on a large scale, at least when it comes to reducing heart disease.
In the 1970s, Karelia in east Finland was the heart attack capital of the world, and Finnish men in general had the highest coronary mortality rate.
Doctors and health authorities began educating citizens about risk factors for heart disease by involving the media, local businesses, medical professionals and politicians.
"We started with the message that heart disease can be prevented," says Professor Pekka Puska, director of the project.
"We asked people to make healthy lifestyle changes for their own benefit and as an example to others."
It worked.
By 1995, the incidence of coronary heart disease mortality had dropped by 73% in North Karelia and 65% in all of Finland.
So far, says Dr. Aila Rissanen, president of the Finnish Association for the Study of Obesity, she has been unable to persuade either the government or local health authorities to launch a similarly large-scale anti-obesity campaign.
One country that is attempting such a concerted effort is the Czech Republic, which has seen a leveling off of obesity rates since 1985.
The country has an obesity management system that includes five regional centers for obesity management, around 40 independent obesity specialists, counseling centers and weight-reduction clubs.
In the UK, one might expect the government to be spearheading anti-obesity efforts.
In fact, the focus remains on eliminating smoking, still the number one killer, along with cancer and cardiovascular disease, whose rates will not decline, of course, unless obesity is reduced.
Tessa Jowell, outgoing British Minister of State for Public Health, cites a number of interlocking initiatives, including National Lottery-funded Healthy Living Centers, cooking programs for children, improving the availability of fresh food in deprived areas.
Nevertheless, Jowell takes a very firm position that obesity is, to some extent, a personal matter, where people need "to take responsibility for themselves."
Jowell is also recognizes that many obese people would like the government-and everyone else-to stay out of their affairs.
In America, the "fat acceptance" movement is, well-advanced, with anti-discrimination law firms catering to an overweight clientele and movements to enlarge movie theater seats.
In Europe, fat people are just beginning to assert their rights.
An organization called Eurobesitas plans to set up free call centers throughout Europe next year to provide overweight people with credible information.
Like smoking, what people know to be healthy and what they choose to do about it are two very different propositions.
"Obesity," admits Jebb, "is not the kind of disease you're likely to be able to cure.
It's a chronic, relapsing problem.
andlsqb; Treating it andrsqb; is an incredibly daunting prospect. "
But the consequences of leaving it untreated may be more daunting still.
Chris Niedenthal, a Warsaw-based photographer, has taken to slathering his cheese with butter.
When he's thirsty, sometimes he gulps down a nice tall glass of 30%-fat heavy cream.
For breakfast he'll have all the bacon and eggs he wants - but no toast.
What is missing from his diet?
Fruits, vegetables and all but 50 g of carbohydrates a day.
"The best thing, really, is fried pork," he says.
As sure as a yo-yo goes down, then right back up, there will always be new diets.
There will always be people willing to offer glowing testimonials to add to the bottom line of the estimated $35 billion-in the U.S. alone-diet industry.
Niedenthal says that not only has he lost 12 kg in 18 months on his counterintuitive diet regime, "I have much more energy and my complexion has improved."
As for his cholesterol levels, well, he hasn't had them checked yet.
The diet that Niedenthal follows, the "Optimal Nourishment" plan, was developed by a Pole named Jan Kwasniewski, a doctor whose books are sold on street corners.
Optimal Nourishment also resembles a version of the extreme low-carbohydrate mania now sweeping the United States;
rumor has it that television star Jennifer Aniston owes her new skinny frame to it.
Several current best sellers including a new edition of the "diet revolution" by Dr. Robert C. Atkins of 1970s and new book called Sugar Busters! by some very clever businessmen and a doctor.
The idea behind Sugar Busters! is that anything that raises insulin levels, such as sugar, potatoes, corn, white rice, bread from refined flour, fresh fruits or milk, is bad for you.
This notion originally came from the writings of France's favorite diet writer, Michel Montignac.
The French may have obesity levels of only around 8%, (three times lower than Americans) but as their love of anti-cellulite creams reveals, they are not immune from a belief in the miracle cure, and Montignac has benefited handsomely.
A former employee of a pharmaceutical firm, he has written 11 books which have sold 9 million copies in 28 countries, espousing the Montignac Method: consume those carbohydrates that reduce the glucose in the blood.
"If you're overweight it's not that you eat too much but that you don't eat well," Montignac says.
"It's complete nonsense today to say that in order to lose weight one has to do sports."
But perhaps not as nonsensical as some of the other weird stuff out there.
In Britain there's a new product called "X-Fat" that is derived from shellfish and allegedly keeps fat from being absorbed by the body.
Some Germans have taken to drinking cider vinegar neat.
And the truly desperate can always munch on Matricur, a sponge that, when swallowed, swells to 18 times its size and fills up the stomach.
Not surprisingly, all of this makes nutrition experts despair.
"If those fads worked, there wouldn't be a billion-dollar diet industry," says Bettye Travis, president of the board of directors of the U.S. National Association to Advance Fat Acceptance.
"People would lose their excess weight and that would be it."
British dietician Lyndel Costain agrees.
"As the slimming industry's profits get bigger," she notes ominously, "so do our waistlines."
Students carry more stuff in the backpacks these days, including laptops and athletic clothes.
Doing so the wrong way, warns the American Physical Therapy Association, can lead to back pain and even scoliosis, especially for pubescent girls, who are at greater risk for curvature of the spine.
APTA's advice: buy packs with wide straps (narrow ones can cut off circulation), wear both straps, and make sure the pack is no more than 15% to 20% of body weight.
New treatments and medications are emerging to offer relief for many millions of sufferers
Although an estimated 50 million Americans suffer from chronic pain, only 26% of those battling moderate to severe pain see the proper specialists.
The complexity of diagnosing the condition and designing a treatment for a specific patient, especially prescribing possibly addictive narcotic-based painkillers, can make this a task if a physician isn't well-versed in pain management.
Chronic pain is generally defined as persistent pain, like daily migraines, or pain that continues after an injury heals or fails to heal.
Dr. Russell Portenoy of New York City's Beth Israel Medical Center, president of the American Pain Society, urges a comprehensive assessment of the pain's characteristics, including its causes and impact on the patient's activity and quality of life.
If doctors undertake an assessment without your asking, that's fine.
But if they're prescribing for you without a thorough exam, you should be suspicious.
In the 90s, unconventional pain medications have exploded onto the scene.
These drugs are considered adjuvant therapies because they're usually used in conjunction with conventional medications when the latter fail to provide relief.
Occasionally they're prescribed alone.
Surprisingly, new painkillers are antiseizure medications.
According to Southern Medical Journal, anecdotal evidence suggests that antiseizure drugs provide the best relief for neuropathic pain, associated with nerve problems.
The newest and most successful has been gabapentin, which seems to relieve a wide range of nerve pain, including that often accompanying cancer and AIDS.
Drowsiness, dizziness, nausea and unsteadiness can usually be alleviated by adjusting the dosages of the drug, while more severe side effects, such as liver toxicity, blood disorders and disturbed vision, are relatively rare.
Antidepressants have been used for the past 20 years as adjuvants in pain relief.
The most effective appear to the tricyclics, prescribed for a broad spectrum of pain, including headaches, arthritis, chronic low-back pain, fibromyalgia, cancer pain and diabetic nerve pain; they can in some people lower blood pressure, create confusion and cause constipation and urine retention.
Chronic pain makes life miserable for millions.
Fears of addiction are understandable, but evidence suggests that many of the older and newer medications can be safely prescribed.
They won't work for everyone, but there's a strong chance, if you suffer from chronic pain, they’ll make your life a lot more comfortable.
For more on pain, visit the American Pain Society at www.ampainsoc.org.
A vaccine is possible, but the final death toll depends on how Asia copes
Predicting the future is risky business for a scientist.
It is safe to say, however, that the global AIDS epidemic will get much worse before it gets any better.
Sadly, this modern plague will be with us for several generations, despite major scientific advances.
As of January 2000, the AIDS epidemic has claimed 15 million lives and left 40 million people living with a viral infection that slowly but relentlessly erodes the immune system.
Accounting for more than 3 million deaths in the past year alone, the AIDS virus has become the deadliest microbe in the world, more lethal than even TB and malaria.
There are 34 developing countries where the prevalence of this infection is 2% or greater.
In Africa nearly a dozen countries have a rate higher than 10%, including four southern African nations in which a quarter of the people are infected.
And the situation continues to worsen; more than 6 million new infections appeared in 1999.
This is like condemning 16,000 people each day to a slow and miserable death.
Fortunately, the AIDS story has not been all gloom and doom.
Less than two years after AIDS was recognized, the guilty agent - human immunodeficiency virus, or HIV - was identified.
We now know more about HIV than about any other virus, and 14 AIDS drugs have been developed and licensed in the U.S. and Western Europe.
The epidemic continues to rage, however, in South America, Eastern Europe and sub-Saharan Africa.
By the year 2025, AIDS will be by far the major killer of young Africans, decreasing life expectancy to as low as 40 years in some countries and single-handedly erasing the public health gains of the past 50 years.
It is Asia, with its huge population at risk, that will have the biggest impact on the global spread of AIDS.
The magnitude of the pandemic could range from 100 million to 1 billion, depending largely on what happens in India and China.
Four million people have already become HIV-positive in India, and infection is likely to reach several percent in a population of 1 billion.
Half a million Chinese are now infected; the trajectory of China's epidemic, however, is less certain.
An explosive AIDS epidemic in the U.S. is unlikely.
Instead, HIV infection will continue to fester in about 0.5% of the population.
But the complexion of the epidemic will change.
New HIV infections will occur predominately in the underclass, with rates 10 times as high in minority groups.
Nevertheless, American patients will live quality lives for decades, thanks to advances in medical research.
Dozens of powerful and well-tolerated AIDS drugs will be developed, as will novel means to restore the immune system.
A cure for AIDS by the year 2025 is not inconceivable.
But constrained by economic reality, these therapeutic advances will have only limited benefit outside the U.S. and Western Europe.
A vaccine is our only real hope to avert disaster unparalleled in medical history.
A large, concerted effort of research was launched three years ago in the U.S. and hints of promising strategies are emerging from experiments in monkeys.
But even if an AIDS vaccine is developed before 2025, it will require an extraordinary effort of political will among our leaders to get to the people who need it most.
The Cabbage Cure
If you've heard it once, you've heard it a thousand times: Eat your fruits and vegetables!
Now there's a new reason to do so.
Five servings a day may reduce the odds of ischemic stroke by 25%, and 10 servings - swallow hard - by 31%.
Fruits and veggies seem to help prevent the formation of dangerous blood clots associated with strokes.
The best of the bunch: cruciferous vegetables like broccoli and cabbage, as well as citrus fruits.
Hats Off!
It's only a first step, but scientists may be a hair closer to a cure for baldness.
Using injections of a gene - nicknamed the Sonic hedgehog - they have been able to awaken hair follicles from a resting state and force them into an active one.
Alas, that's just in mice.
Whether the therapy works on human pates remains to be seen.
One potential problem: the Sonic hedgehog gene is linked to basal-cell carcinoma, a common, treatable skin cancer.
Can That Headache!
Remember when botulism was a bad thing?
Still is, if you happen to consume the toxin from a contaminated batch of canned food.
But now, years after doctors discovered the toxin's uncanny ability to smooth out wrinkles and quell tremors, a new benefit has been uncovered: botulism toxin seems to alleviate migraine headaches.
In a preliminary study, half the patients whose foreheads were injected with tiny amounts of the botulism drug Botox reported that their migraine headaches disappeared - and stayed away for up to four months.
Boning Up
Don't think you're immune to osteoporosis just because you're a guy.
In the U.S. alone, 2 million men have the bone-thinning ailment, and 3 million more may be at risk.
Now here's some help: the first major study on men with osteoporosis shows that Fosamax - a non-hormonal drug that helps treat the disease in postmenopausal women - also works in men.
The bone density of men who took it increased 7% regardless of their age.
Bad News
Time Lapse Sorry, jet-lag sufferers.
A report shows that melatonin may be no better than a sugar pill in alleviating the sleepiness and disorientation of long-distance travel.
Nearly 250 subjects were given either a placebo or one of two commonly used doses of melatonin (5 mg and .5mg).
Result: they all experienced similar jet-lag symptoms, and all recovered after about six days.
Snooze Alarm
Talk about a drunken stupor.
Doctors say not getting enough sleep may dull your senses as much as drinking alcohol does.
Folks with sleep-apnea - a common disorder in which sufferers momentarily awaken throughout the night because breathing stops - did worse on 3 out of 7 tests of reaction time than those whose blood-alcohol level would make them too drunk to drive in some American states.
Could ordinary insomniacs run into the same problems?
Probably, doctors say.
This rigorous form of filmmaking is all the rage.
First stop: Copenhagen.
Next stop: Hollywood?
In his conference room on the Universal lot, Steven Spielberg showed a couple of guests a printed card.
On the card was "The Vow of Chastity" - Ten Commandments of simplified filmmaking, as proclaimed in the Dogme '95 manifesto by directors Lars von Trier and Thomas Vinterberg.
Spielberg spoke enthusiastically about Dogme and said he'd like to make a film under its rules.
Wait a minute.
Why should the most successful filmmaker in history subject himself to these severe cinemagraphic restrictions, jotted down in half an hour by a couple of daffy Danes?
Why would any director toss away the tools of power and sorcery that the movies have spent a century developing?
No 150-person crew, no wide screen, no post-synchronizing of dialogue, no E.T. or dinosaurs.
No tripod for the camera.
And no director's credit.
Yet Dogme is the hot word in serious film circles.
Its precepts were first used in Vinterberg's The Celebration, the dysfunctional family drama that was a world-wide success.
Dogme 2 was Von Trier's The Idiots, an aggressive comedy with porno elements.
Then came three more films: Soren Kragh-Jacobsen's Mifune, about a young businessman who goes home to settle his late father's estate; Kristian Levring's The King Is Alive, set in Namibia and starring Jennifer Jason Leigh; and, released, the first American Dogme film, julien donkey-boy, by genius nasty boy Harmony Korine.
If Dogme spreads beyond art houses, it will be not because it suggests a vital new way to make pictures, but because today's directors feel crushed by technological gimmickry.
The acrobatic cinematography of the French New Wave, the anti-dramatic films of Bresson and Antonioni, the non-linear experiments of the American avant garde - each of these was a revolutionary call to arms.
Dogme is a call to disarm, to do away with false pretenses, to walk without crutches supplied by Industrial Light and; Magic.
Dogme loves innocence; it aims for a primitive purity.
"Filmmakers and filmgoers are yearning for something else," says cinematographer Anthony Dod Mantle, who shot The Celebration, Mifune and julien donkey-boy.
"But not necessarily something new.
A refocusing on the story.
The nakedness and simplicity of Dogme have put us back in touch with the essentials of filmmaking. "
Korine, wrote the satricial film Kids, then made on his own the controversial film Gummo.
He had already been planned his recent film julien donkey-boy, which is the story of a schizophrenic (Scottish actor Ewen Bremner), his bullying dad (Werrier Herzog) and pregnant sister (Chloe Sevigny), when Von Trier suggested he make it under Dogme strictures.
"I liked the idea of it being a rescue action from the level of cosmetics," he says, "The idea of not hiding behind the trickery."
Bremner found that the stripped-down system let him focus on his craft:
"I don't have to reserve a portion of my brain to monitor technical mechanics-lighting rigs, camera tracks, field of focus.
I can dedicate myself fully to realize what I want to do. "
Dogme might seem way too, well, dogmatic; a director who has filmed under its rules must sign a "Confession" of any deviations.
(Korine: "I confess that in the turkey-dinner scene, I made my grandmother go to the grocery store and buy a batch of raw cranberries...")
But Dogme is as much a game as it is a cult.
Indeed, Korine broke nearly every Dogme rule.
At the beginning of julien donkey-boy he stages a violent death (Rule 6).
At the end he credits himself (Rule 10).
In between he all kinds of optical tricks (Rule 5).
And what happened to the vaunted Dogme "simplicity"?
julien donkey-boy was 1999's most mannered film.
Nothing screams artifice so much as the collision of the reel and the real.
The danger of any innovation is that it quickly becomes calcified.
But that may not happen with Dogme.
The Danish filmmakers who made the first four Dogme films held an highly innovative millennial blast.
Each filmed part of a script written by the four.
Each director's scenes were shown live on a different TV channel on Dec. 31, with viewers doing their own editing by flicking the remote.
As U.S. filmmakers, locked in stasis, consider the next century, the Danish challenge might look appealing.
A glum romance lacking wit, glamour or passion After many years of study and practice, Harrison Ford has nearly mastered the art of talking without moving his lips.
Kristin Scott Thomas is newer at the game of masking her emotions, but chilly elegance has all but eclipsed the sexiness she exuded in The English Patient.
There is no other real news from Random Hearts, a grim, draggy and dismal romance.
Ford is a Washington detective named Dutch Van Den Broeck; Scott Thomas is a Congresswoman named Kay Chandler.
Both their spouses are killed in a plane crash, and he suspects that they were lovers.
She perhaps agrees, but prefers denial and resumption of her re-election campaign.
This is very sensible of her, especially in light of Dutch's maniacal pursuit of all the dreary details of the adulterous back-story.
Watching Dutch's obsessive pursuit of the truth is merely tedious and glum.
Apparently, though, Kay likes sullen plodders.
No other explanation is offered for her decision to enter into a brief, nervous affair with Dutch.
What director Sydney Pollack, one of the movies' great romantics (Tootsie, Out of Africa), saw in this dismal tale is even harder to imagine.
There's no heat, wit or glamour in his telling of it.
This movie has a scandalous premise, but fails to amuse - even through irony.
In the contest to select an America's Cup challenger, the underdogs may be short on funds, but memories of Team New Zealand's 1995 win fill their sails with hope.
When yachts compete for a slot in the America's Cup, the race can seem like a knife fight.
Ed Baird, skipper of Young America had planned to pack an Uzi - but his plans were dashed when his US$ 5 million sloop split and nearly sank while racing the Japanese Nippon Challenge.
In seconds the US$ 40 million invested in Young America's team and their chances of beating the 10 other contenders were jeopardized.
After 13 years of being out of the running, the New York Yacht Club - holder of the cup for 132 of its 150-year existence - wants it back.
However, they aren't alone in seeking international yachting's most coveted prize in a winner-take-all series.
New York's domination ended when two upstarts, Australia and New Zealand, became the only countries since the Cup's 1851 inception to steal it away.
These teams success against the American Goliath suddenly signaled to everyone that the cup was winnable.
As a result, the Cup competition has begun to resemble an all-out war - and not the naval campaign it had always seemed.
Today in their arsenals teams sport cutting edge design and building materials, world-class sailors, four years of intensive preparation-and stacks of cash.
Japan's Nippon has even invoked the supernatural by naming one boat after an Indian god of war - and another after a god of speed.
For the right to take on America's Cup holder Team New Zealand, challengers begin four months of elimination-series racing in the Louis Vuitton Cup.
These gladiator-style battles can last up to three hours.
Two 23-meter yachts race over 20 nautical miles up and down a sausage-shaped course marked out by two buoys.
The first to cross the finish line wins.
"It's like a game of chess played in Formula One cars by two rugby teams," says Bruno Trouble, director of the Louis Vuitton media center.
Young America's Captain, who had helped coach Team New Zealand to their 1995 victory, seemed a solid contender until his sloop's misfortune.
During the race, Baird's lead over Nippon had dwindled from 42 seconds to within two boat lengths.
With a rising swell and the wind touching 20-knots, the Young America's skipper decided to tack in order to maintain his advantage.
"You don't sit back and think I shouldn't turn here because the boat might not handle it," said Baird later.
"We're got to push when it's time to push."
That push cost Young America the race, and possibly the series.
As the yacht turned - it rose high on a wave - then slammed down hard twice.
Nippon's crew watched their competitor's boat crumple as its bow rose roughly 12 meters in the air.
The impact broke the decks of the yacht just behind its mast - but the hull held.
The crew scramble back aboard and miraculously managed to keep the boat afloat.
After the crippled Young America was towed back into Harbor the New York Yacht Club requested permission to use its second boat - a near twin of the first - for the remaining seven in the series.
The club plans to repair and modify their shattered ship-and likely modify the second as well - to make both more resilient.
Strengthening these boats however, could make them heavier and slower - thus defeating their design priorities of lightness and speed.
Like the designers of Formula One racecars, the creators of these high-tech, high-performance sloops seek constant technical improvement to gain an extra advantage.
Boats now are narrower: since 1992, they're slimmed from an average 4.6 m wide to an anorexic 4 m prompting some to assert that they have become too narrow.
Baird might disagree.
Says Baird: "Technology wins the event, but it's a matter of finding the right combination for the venue."
He implies that rough seas and narrow boat design conspired to split Young America.
Winning through innovation has long been a hallmark of the race.
From 1983, keel innovations have received great attention; in that year an outraged New York Yacht Club tried unsuccessfully to have the winged keel of Alan Bond's Australian II banned in a courtroom.
In 1987 New Zealand created a furor by racing in a fiberglass boat.
The International America's Cup Class specifications, introduced in 1992, allow the use of materials such as carbon fiber and honeycomb cores, but outlaw rotating masts, the heating, cooling or soaping of hulls, and the attachment of moving winglets to keels.
With the setback to the New York Yacht Club entry, attention will focus on the other leading challengers.
In front was Prada, which had lost only once before.
In only their second Cup challenge, Prada is a bright contender.
Their sponsor, Mr. Parizio Bertelli, Prada couture house CEO, offered to pay for the Olympic campaigns of three top New Zealand-based sailors if they would coach the Italian team.
Prada skipper and helmsman Francesco de Angelis, a benefactor of Bertelli's offer, feels Europe's time has come.
"It keeps the Cup alive if a nation other than America wins it," he says.
AmericaOne, skippered by 1997-98 Whitbread Round the World Race winner Paul Cayard and backed by San Francisco's St. Francis Yacht Club, has a budget of $30 million from sponsors that include Ford and Hewlett Packard.
The New York Yacht Club's Young America has a $40 million war chest provided by individual supporters as well as corporations like Air New Zealand and watchmaker Breitling.
Nippon has spent more than a decade chasing its Cup dream.
Their Australian born captain, the world's top-ranked match racer Peter Gilmour, lived in Japan for three years to satisfy the Cup's crew-nationality rules.
Syndicate head Tatsumitsu Yamasaki, chairman of spice giant S&B Foods, is hungry for a win.
Asked if this was the year, Gilmour cautiously replied, "The Japanese will win....
It's just a matter of when it will happen. "
In 1995 New Zealand showed that simply having money doesn't guarantee victory.
Though their budget wasn't ranked in the top five, they won the Cup 5-0 against defender Dennis Conner of the San Diego Yacht Club.
Sheer skill prevailed as Team New Zealand outwitted the home of NASA, Boeing, and the like.
Their victory inspired other lower-budget challengers.
Suddenly less wealthy teams began to see reason for hope.
Le Defi, along with Young Australia, operate on modest budgets.
What they lack in money however, they make up for in youth, enthusiasm and passion.
Team Australia's crew - entirely under age 25 - has a skipper all of age 20.
Youth hostels and bicycles are the order of the day for these youngsters in Auckland.
Though not favored to win, few doubt that these teams will become strong contenders as a result of this year's experience.
For other low-budget teams though, the struggle has been simply in getting to Auckland to recover their $250,000 race-entry deposit.
Racing against a deadline, a lucky first-time Swiss team finally found funds to complete their boat.
Others have been less fortunate.
Among the difficulties: the hijacking of the St. Petersburg Yacht Club's boat, lack of sponsors for the Brits, and legal disputes over missing funds for Hong Kong.
For all nations, winning the America's Cup is proof of technological and sporting prowess.
It's also the only race where the winners take home the trophy - and the event.
In Auckland, public and private investment has topped US$ 63 million for everything from new bars and restaurants  to a special America's Village for teams and boats.
With an international TV audience, Auckland's little-known port is poised to become world-famous.
The hospitality industry is uncorking the bubbly - a New Zealand sparkling wine, to celebrate the hosting of Cup.
They are set to showcase the fine food and wine that New Zealand has to offer.
The added exposure that Australia and New Zealand have given the Cup has made it all the more desirable for the U.S. to reclaim: the New York Yacht Club is already forecasting a US$ 1 billion boon to the region if the Cup returns.
The Cup spells money - from increased tourism, to international TV rights, to added profits for sponsors.
However while others look to their bottom lines, crews are staying focused on their keels, on the weather, on the waves, and on their skills; for it is these things matter as well.
As Team New Zealand's Coutts advises: "Money doesn't win the Cup - everything does."
As Hollywood keeps telling us, marriage isn't always a breeze.
But do trial separations work?
Marriage is big lately; actually it's unmarriage that seems to be capturing our attention.
From the award-winning American Beauty to the Bruce Willis-Michelle Pfeiffer movie, The Story of Us, the institution of marriage is being turned inside out, and it's not a pretty sight.
To judge by these films, modern marriage involves a lot of broken crockery and busted expectations.
While many current Hollywood depictions of marriage may be overly pessimistic, statistics in America are alarming: each year half as many Americans get divorced as marry.
Marriage counselors say couples often choose to separate as a last-ditch effort to change their relationship, and possibly themselves.
"Many trial separations don't work because they're not'authentic' they're just one person's way of getting out of the relationship," says Harriet Lerner, author of the book The Dance of Anger.
But a separation can give couples time to calm down, renegotiate the rules of the relationship and gain some needed distance.
For a separation to work, it needs to be well defined.
Constance Ahrons, director of the Marriage and Family Therapy Training program at the University of Southern California, says "structured separations" tend to be the most productive.
Couples facing separation do best if they establish some basic ground rules first.
They should mutually agree on the length of the separation-Ahrons says three to six months is average-and both must continue to work on their own problems during that time, either with or without a counselor.
Couples should agree not to see lawyers during their separation.
Lawyers have a way of moving marriage toward divorce.
During their period of trial separation couples should not pursue each other at all, either to fight or to reconcile, but should agree in advance on what kind of contact they will have.
Separated couples can agree to speak on the phone for a prearranged period, for instance, or meet once a week.
Some therapists advise their clients to agree not to talk to each other about their relationship during these encounters and to use the time apart to reflect on their own lives and see what they can change about themselves.
If there are children involved, Ahrons says, both parties need to agree on all the ground rules having to do with kids.
Parents should also be aware that repeated separations and reconciliations are difficult and confusing for children.
Ahrons says a separation, while painful, can help keep the anger down and give a couple time to think.
If both are unsure about the future of the marriage, it can provide a time-out, during which they can see what life would be like without the other.
"Sometimes," Ahrons says, "a separation can lead back into marriage.
Sometimes it leads to divorce.
But if couples are able to clarify things, it will improve their marriage - or, make their divorce better. "
Question: What's wackier than a lone man hauling a massive, equipment-laden sled 700 km, from Canada's Ward Hunt Island to the North Pole?
Answer: Hauling two sleds.
But this is what British explorer SIR RANULPH TWISLETON-WYKEHAM-FIENNES, 55 - once called "mad but marvelous" by Prince Charles - has announced he will do come February.
For 80 days he will pull one sled forward, then go back for the other.
And so on - provided he doesn't run out of strength or food, develop hypothermia or lose his mind.
Why would he bother?
There's the book deal, the charity sponsorship, "and yes," Fiennes says, "I suppose you could say because it is there."
No sooner had high-powered barrister and mother of three Cherie Booth, 45, announced that she was expecting a fourth child in May than the number crunching began.
The lady in question happens to be married to British Prime Minister Tony Blair.
Labour party strategists, encouraged by the immediate increase in the PM's popularity ratings caused by the news, quickly worked out that baby Blair's first steps should coincide with Dad's reelection bid.
Good move Tony.
But last December, Britons were caught up in a more intriguing calculation.
When - and where - had the baby been conceived?
The British press swiftly looked at their calendars.
Could it have happened during the couple's Tuscan holiday?
A trip to Gascony?
No, Blair finally suggested, clinging desperately to his last shreds of dignity, this was a British baby, a dividend of his annual visit to the Queen's retreat at her castle in Scotland, Balmoral.
A Highland fling no less.
Aspiring filmmakers, are you feeling overlooked, underappreciated, and undiscovered?
Not to worry.
Leonardo DiCaprio, whose movie-star status has helped him become wildly rich and fabulously hedonistic, announced he is giving back to the industry by inaugurating the First Annual Leonardo DiCaprio International Online Short Film Festival (official nickname: LeoFest).
Movie-makers can now submit works no longer that 15 minutes to be judged in four categories by a panel of experts; The best films will be loaded onto the Internet (www.leofes.com) beginning this summer.
"This festival strives to offer a level field on which anyone who wishes may play," says DiCaprio.
Young filmmakers in particular are invited to participate in this egalitarian opportunity.
Whatever air travel brings in the next 20 years, fitness centers and piano bars are probably not part of the plan.
Although super-jumbos, double-decker aircraft capable of carrying up to 850 passengers, are being discussed by aviation executives with vast enthusiasm, anyone who flies a lot knows that airlines wring every dollar they can out of their available inches.
The Airbus Industrie A3XX, with a double-decker fuselage which can carry up to 656 people in three classes, is the plane that has sparked the dreams of airborne cruise ships.
Its main deck will accommodate economy passengers in the same 3-4-3 configuration as the Boeing 747, but with an extra 26 cm of width.
Airbus is betting $12 billion that airlines will want to fly more passengers on a larger plane.
The firm hopes to start making deals with airlines next year to deliver the A3XX in 2004.
The aircraft will cost around $200 million, $3 million more than a Boeing 747-400, but Airbus claims its plane will be at least 15% more efficient in terms of flight cost per seat.
US manufacturer Boeing, maker of the 747-400, doesn't plan to build a super-jumbo, claiming that the market for bigger planes isn't big enough to bother.
Instead, it is offering a stretch version of the 747 that will seat 500.
The company is also focusing on medium-size, long-range aircraft such as the 301-seat 777-200X that will be able to fly from Hong Kong to New York nonstop.
Boeing foresees the industry's current "hub-and-spoke" system giving way to more point-to-point connections, which many flyers prefer.
Airbus executives agree that more varied, long-range routes will develop, and they're planning aircraft to serve them.
But the European firm figures that major population centers will still dominate traffic.
Passenger capacity in Asia is expected to triple in the next two decades, from the current 442,000 seats a year to 1.2 million.
Airbus predicts that by 2018 there will be 660 super-jumbos in the skies over Asia.
Critics say that this will mean longer boarding and disembarking times plus longer waits at immigration, baggage claim and customs.
Airbus argues that an additional exit door will let passengers get off the A3XX as quickly as they would the 747-400.
And having larger jets may mean having fewer planes.
Fewer planes taking off and landing will equal less waiting on the tarmac.
Larger aircraft may mean more amenities for passengers in first and business class and may give rise to a fourth class, something between economy and business.
Regardless of the future of commercial aviation, you probably won't be needing your water wings in the air.
ROCKET E-BOOK(www.franklin.com)
On the go?
Do digital!
Fit 10 books into the space of 1 with the Rocket EB-500.
This $300 device offers an easy to read back-lit screen and operates 30 hours per 90 minute battery charge.
Download any of 750 titles to your computer, then upload to the Rocket.
Title prices are competitive with paper book prices found online.
Get going by visiting www.franklin.com for further information.
All city life is not a rat race.
Proof: Chengdu, the bustling industrial center of China's Sichuan province, where the citizens have mastered the art of outdoor relaxation.
They gather along the winding back alleys of the city's temples and parks and for about US $25 are served a hot, bottomless cup of jasmine tea.
Like a kind of art, the patrons delicately grip saucer, cup and lid in one hand and hold back the leaves as they sip.
Besides delicious tea, prior to the Cultural Revolution these historic teahouses hosted lively conversations.
Discussion on philosophy and political theory abounded, Sichuan opera was performed, and storytellers shared humorous anecdotes and Chinese fairytales.
Once offically discouraged, these venues have made a strong comeback.
Today however, conversations rarely go beyond shopping and housing.
Want to unwind?
The teahouse at the peaceful and friendly Wenshu Monastery is just the spot.
Early morning brings Buddhist worshipers to the incense-filled prayer halls.
An old monk may invite you in to see his paintings, and to partake of a little plum schnapps.
For lunch, try the monastery's inexpensive and tasty vegetarian restaurant.
Finally, take refuge in one of the hidden pavilions or pagodas.
Wenshu Monastery, also known as Hollow Wood Temple, is off Renmin Zhonglu down an alley called Wenshu Yuan Jie (entry fee: about US $12).
Europe is about to get its first pan-European cable network capable of delivering cross-border phone calls, faxes, e-mail, news and movies.
Amsterdam-based cable company UPC will use the Global TeleSystems Group (GTS) network to link its cable channels and offer Internet access, voice telephony and programming.
GTS offers Internet and voice services and will allow UPC to provide high-speed, low-cost content over the same pipe.
UPC Internet access subsidiary, Chello, is in competition with US Internet service provider @home to win European consumers.
A Europe-wide network gives UPC the commercial clout to negotiate deals with providers like France's Canal+, allowing for cooperative discussion on content and interactive television.
Deregulation of voice services and consumer demand for high-speed Internet access are spurring the upgrade of cable networks in both Europe and the US.
CALLWAVE, an Internet telephone company based in Santa Barbara, California, offers an Internet Answering Machine (IAM), free software that will answer calls when the user is on the Internet using the same telephone line.
IAM, (www.callwave.com), takes messages for the user, who listens instantly or saves them for later.
WITH THE WEB now home to 800 million pages, Oslo-based Fast Search and; Transfer (FAST) has developed a search engine (www.alltheweb.com) capable of scanning over 200 million of them.
FAST is currently working on an engine that searches "All the Web, all the time."
MOTOROLA, IBM AND QNX developed, mobileGT, an automotive driver information system, allows audio and video streaming from the Internet.
For example, the driver could listen to music by downloading MP3 files from the Net, or the children in the back seat could play online games via an interactive screen.
DigiScents, based in Oakland, California, plans to launch everything from "scent-enabled" websites to fragrant e-mail through its iSmell device.
Operated by ScentStream software, iSmell creates different smells from its in-built palette of scented oils.
DigiScents is also planning the world's first Snortal an iSmell website where users design and distill their own fragrances.
Need some information about the products at your local supermarket?
Computer-based Friend@Call assists consumers in making product purchases.
Developed by Friendlyway AG and shop-fitters Hansa Kontor Group, Friend@Call uses sensors to detect puzzled shoppers who pause in front of particular products.
Consumers can access product information from a computer database mounted on supermarket shelves.
Ericsson's iPulse promises real-time messaging with family, friends and colleagues over any type of mobile communications device.
Through a flexible opt-in, opt-out private system, users can see people on a personal buddy list currently online, as well as their physical location.
It is to be launched in Europe within the next few weeks.
Motorola is working on a concept called the iRadio that will integrate music and personalized Internet services on a dashboard device.
The iRadio could be programmed with the listening preferences of various family members, for example, so that it automatically finds the station that plays the desired music regardless of the car's location.
It could also alert the driver when the car is running low on fuel and then provide directions to the nearest gas station of the driver's choice.
The iRadio could also monitor selected stock prices and provide early warnings on the latest traffic jams, plus convenient escape routes.
Bangkok has a new traffic problem: unemployed elephants.
With their owners unable to feed them, hundreds are flocking to the city to scavenge for food.
Municipal authorities are implanting microchips into the elephants so that they can be traced and identified.
If an elephant is caught in the same city twice, the governor of the province from which it came will be penalized.
The goal is to protect the elephants from themselves and motorists.
A skillful blend of horror and promotion create the film event of 1999
In October of 1997, three young actors went into the woods near Burkittsville, Maryland, to play in a horror movie.
Two years later, their film was a smash.
It was the talk, not just of Hollywood, but of moviegoers everywhere.
In the United States last summer, you could hardly walk down a bustling street or log on to a website without tripping over that ominous incantation "Blair Witch."
The impact, sudden and seismic, of the Blair Witch Project is utterly unprecedented.
Never has a - let's be honest - weird movie budgeted at a ludicrously low $35,000 stormed both the box office and the pop consciousness.
In nine weeks of release in the U.S., it grossed $137 million.
This was an incredible nearly 4,000-fold return on its investment.
In percentage terms, that makes this film the most profitable ever.
Its astounding success has made film heroes, and very rich young men, of its directors, Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
And the marketers at Artisan Entertainment, who built fervant desire to see the film through cunning use of the Internet, have been credited with revolutionizing the way films are sold.
Faced with the amazing success of this film, Hollywood cheers and shudders.
Any movie that scares up business is considered good for the rest of the industry.
But this one became a hit by breaking too many rules.
Films with no stars usually make money with charm and sentiment; Blair Witch has neither.
If the mass audience will accept something indirect and confrontational - what next?
The movie was shot with its actors being put through an eight-day survival game.
They supposedly shot the film and made up the dialogue while the directors lurked out of sight, left cryptic notes and played sneaky tricks on them.
What would traditional big studio movie makers think of this?
If the product was eccentric, so was the peddling.
Artisan co-president Amir Malin calls the approach to promoting the film "Guerrilla marketing tactics."
Blair Witch's creative team hustled the movie's clips onto a cable TV show.
It premiered the trailer on the insider "Ain't It Cool News" website.
It also launched its own site, www.blairwitch.com.
The website smartly elaborates on the film's plot by presenting "documents" about the "Blair Witch Mythology, Aftermath and Legend."
Anyone who wants to believe the story, or enjoys a cleverly designed fiction, can browse and learn.
On an investment of $15,000 the site racked up 181 million hits by week's end.
If the marketers at Artisan can create an avid audience on cable and in cyberspace, why should Fox or Warner Brothers spend tens of millions advertising in U.S. newspapers and on prime time TV?
No wonder Hollywood, looking at Blair Witch, is both impressed and concerned.
The reaction of moviegoers was equally schizophrenic.
To some, the film is a rite of passage and haunted-house trip rolled into 81 agitated minutes.
Because of the audience's involvement with the film, theater owners have endured a dip in popcorn sales.
During this film nobody leaves - except to be sick.
Many viewers have vomited during particularly tense scenes.
Others get motion sickness from the jerking style of the hand-held cameras.
A Santa Cruz, California, woman said that a week after seeing the movie, her 14-year-old daughter "still can't sleep at night.
She doesn't want to talk about it.
She won't go outside to feed the dog because she has to pass by some trees, and they remind her of the movie. "
"Not all people appreciated the film, however.
I guess I didn't get it, "said Justin Renfroe, 27, from Atlanta.
He advised friends to "wait for the video."
Exit polls showed that the film had little interest for black audiences, though Hispanics got into it.
Interestingly, a few moviegoers persist in believing, even after the final cast and credit roll, that this clever fiction is for real.
They think it's a documentary that ends in death.
"You mean it's not?" asked Chicago resident Paula Taylor.
The website made it sound as if it was.
I can't believe it. "
The biggest Blair Witch shock has been felt by the movie's directors.
"When we did the film," Sanchez says, "We hoped for a video or cable deal.
When Artisan told us the film would be released in theaters, we were thinking,... if we make $10 million, it'd be a dream come true.
But to do $29 million in one weekend, and then to keep going as we have, was beyond our comprehension... "
Perhaps you're wondering how this all got started.
Here's the story.
Myrick, 35, and Sanchez, 30, met in 1990 while film students at the University of Central Florida in Orlando.
"A few years ago," Myrick says "We got on the subject of old... phoney documentaries that really creeped us out when we were kids.
Later on, we came up with the premise of the three filmmakers getting lost in the woods.
Our movie would be about the found footage.
From there it germinated into building this mythology. "
Here's the premise of the film.
The town of Burkittsville, once Blair, is haunted by stories of a witch.
People say that for two centuries she has lured children to her home, making some of them face the wall while she killed the others.
Fast forward to the film's first title card: "In October of 1994, three student filmmakers disappeared in the woods near Burkittsville, Maryland, while shooting a documentary.
A year later their footage was found. "
There are no actors' or directors' names, no screenplay credit - nothing to hint that the film is not a true story.
Thus the film begins to encourage the moviegoers' capacity to believe... anything.
The trio of Montgomery College students have come to Burkittsville to interview the locals and spend two days tracking down the witch's house in the nearby woods.
Director Heather Donahue, cameraman Joshua Leonard and sound man Michael Williams think it will be a lark, but they have underestimated the legend's potency and overestimated their skills in camping and coping.
Within a day or two, they are lost and getting on one another's nerves.
At night, huddled in their tent, they begin to suspect menace from someone or something outside.
Could it be the Blair Witch?
They hear noises, feel the tent rattling, and find three small rocks and twigs bundled in an ominous symbol.
Then, one morning, they notice slime on Josh's backpack.
The movie continues to get more intense from that point on, but we won't spoil the ending for you.
Blair Witch, like any movie, has many antecedents.
It is, by our casual count, the 873rd horror movie about youths who go into the woods on a lark, and come out dead.
In common with earlier independent horror classics like Night of the Living Dead and The Texas Chain Saw Massacre, the new film makes a virtue of its seeming artlessness.
A picture's dead air, ragged acting and extreme shifts of emotional tone throw the viewer off balance.
This is not your standard Hollywood movie, whose technical finesse reassures even as it excites.
The bizarre independent horror films seem unmitigated and out of control.
The pretense goes further in Blair Witch.
Since so much is shot in video (on Heather's camera), it could be an episode of some cheesy real-TV show.
Says Sanchez: "The rule is, if you see a shaky handheld video image, it must be real."
Something else that attracted critics and the first viewers to Blair Witch is the film's bold sense of withholding Horror, after all, is a genre that gravitates to the lurid edge.
The jaded audience wants more - more teasing sex, more gross-out gore.
Then there's Blair Witch, it has no sex or even sexual tension, no music of any kind, no demonic power tools.
There is no prowling, voyeuristic camera from the killer's point of view.
This movie is all about the victims and the victims they make of each other.
There are no shock cuts to the monster.
In fact, no visible monster!
The audience sees only what the camera does, so at night it is sometimes pitch-black.
For excruciating minutes, we are literally in the dark.
There's no slashing - except of everything unnecessary to the creation of psychological disorder.
Blair Witch makes the viewer collaborate actively in both the scenario and the scariness.
Says Sanchez: "Horror is something that works in the viewer's mind, not really onscreen."
Myrick and Sanchez had tried to cast their main characters for two years before finding Donahue, Leonard and Williams.
They gave the actors a 35-page plot outline and a lesson or two in handling a camera.
Josh got an old CP-16-mm film camera.
"We showed him how to load it and how not to destroy it," says Myrick.
Heather was given a High-8 video camera.
The directors bought the High-8 for $500.
After the shooting, they returned the camera to the store and got a refund.
For eight days and nights in autumn, 1997, the actors were effectively on their own.
They shot all the footage, as their characters were supposedly doing.
They invented their dialogue.
The directors say they were usually out of sight and hearing from their stars.
Each day they would leave notes in a box for each actor.
The notes gave general instructions - clues, really - on what to do.
If Mike were to confess he'd thrown away the map, the others wouldn't know until he said it.
At night, when the actors were in their tent, says Sanchez, "we'd go out on our raids and scare them - wake them up, leave things behind.
We basically played the Blair Witch. "
Finally they had 20 hours of footage.
"It was like we wrote the script during the editing," Myrick says.
They used the other material for a devious promotional film, Curse of the Blair Witch.
It was shown on the Sci-Fi Channel in the U.S.
That material also got onto the website designed by Sanchez.
Rarely have outtakes proved so useful.
They helped create a Blair "world."
"You could get into the spirit of the folklore we created without having to see the movie," Sanchez says, "or vice versa."
Now that their first feature film is headed for $250 million at the worldwide box office, Myrick and Sanchez have just one thing ahead of them: the sophomore jinx.
They describe their next film as a crazy and stupid comedy called Heart of Love.
Could it tank?
Of course with any film, failure is always a possibility.
People involved with Blair Witch realize that the amazing success of this film does not ensure a similar success in the future.
Blair Witch is a film that antagonizes as many folks as it enthralls.
It could be a fleeting fad with no profound meaning for the future of film.
"There's no good lesson to learn here, says John Pierson, whose cable show helped get Blair Witch rolling.
"It's not an independent-film phenomenon.
What you really have is a convergence of old and new media. "
And a film that blends the thrill of the unseen with the art of selling the film to the public.
Then there's that fascinating behind-the-scenes story: that the actors basically made the film while the directors were sneaking around playing tricks on them.
The story could be true, though no one has done it in a century of film-making.
If it is true, then the actors should be getting as much money as the directors.
And if it's not - if it's just one more example of the elaborate Blair Witch mythology - then that is the art of the shell game.
To invent both a fake documentary and a persuasive tale about how it was made: that's true Witchcraft.
To read the transcript of an online chat with Daniel Myrick and EduardoSanchez, the directors of the Blair Witch Project, go to http: //www.chat.yahoo.com/time
Blair Witch Profit Shooting the movie took eight days in October 1997.
Then came the hard part: getting people to want to see the thing.
Here's how they did it, from whisper to buzz to big box-office noise, in only 21 steps.
Aug. 1997 The film is mentioned on John Peirson's Split Screen show.
June 1998 The filmmakers' own website first appears www.blairwitch.com Jan. 6, 1999 Harry Knowles mentions the film on his irreverent Ain't it Cool News website www.aint-it-cool-news.com/
Jan. 23 The film is shown at the Sundance Film Festival in Park City, Utah.
As part of its promotion, "Missing" leaflets are put up all over Park City with the faces of the three "Lost" filmmakers.
Artisan buys film for $1.1 million.
April 1 -30 Artisan screens the film at 40 colleges in the top 20 markets across the county.
April 2 First trailer appears on Ain't it Cool News website.
May 19 Shown at the Cannes Film Festival.
May 19 Second trailer premiers on MTV.
June 11 Third trailer appears before Star Wars; to stoke curiosity, it is only 40 seconds long.
June 23 Advertising begins in alternative weeklies, like The Village Voice in New York.
July 1 75,000 promotional pamphlets announcing the book are handed out.
July 4 Advertising begins in the mainstream newspapers.
July 5 Radio advertising begins.
July 9 Comic book released.
July 12 Curse of the Blair Witch special first airs on the Sci-Fi Channel.
July 13 TV promotion begins and CD is released.
July 14 Commercial debut at Manhattan's hip Angelika Film Center.
July 16 Film opens in 26 more "downtown" theaters in 25 cities in the U.S.; it becomes a hot ticket as people wait in long lines to buy tickets.
July 30 Opens in total of 1,101 theaters.
Aug.6 Opens in total of 2,142 theaters.
Aug. 9 The book, Blair Witch Project: Dossier, comes out and the film's directors appear on the cover of TIME.
The mobile phone is set to become one of the central technologies of the 21st century.
Within a few years, the mobile phone will evolve into a multi-functional communicator capable of transmitting and receiving not only sound, but also video, still images, data and text.
A whole new era of personal communications is on the way.
Thanks in part to the growth of wireless networks, the telephone is converging with the personal computer and the television.
Soon lightweight phones outfitted with high-resolution screens will be connected to satellites enabling people to talk, send and receive e-mail, or take part in video conferences anytime, anywhere.
These phones might also absorb many of the key functions of the desktop computer.
Mobile devices are expected to be ideal for some of the new personalized services that are becoming available via the Internet, such as trading stocks, gambling, shopping and buying theater and airline tickets.
The telecommunications revolution is already taking shape around the globe.
In Europe, mobile phones are already being used for electronic commerce.
Most phones contain a subscriber identification module (SIM) card to identify a user to the phone network.
But the card could also facilitate limited financial transactions.
Deutsche Bank and Nokia, for example, are working together to develop mobile banking services.
Some manufacturers plan to upgrade the SIM card to an all-in-one personal identification credit card.
Another approach is to add a slot to mobile phones for a second smart card designed for mobile e-commerce.
These cards could be used to make payments over the Internet or to pay for things like public transportation, movie tickets or drinks at a bar.
In France, Motorola and France Telecom are currently testing a dual slot phone, the StarTAC D, while in Finland Nokia is testing a phone that uses a special plug-in reader for a tiny smart card.
Since it is not yet clear whether it's best to do everything with a single device, Siemens is developing dual slot phones and a new product called Einstein.
The latter is a device equipped with a smart card reader and keypad that can be linked to the phone via infrared wireless technology.
It will soon be possible to receive almost all forms of electronic communication through a single device, most likely in a three-in-one phone that serves as a cordless at home, a cell phone on the road and an intercom at work.
"The mobile phone will become increasingly multi-functional," says Burghardt Schallenberger, vice president for technology and innovation at Siemens Information and Consumer Products in Munich.
"Fingerprint technology and advanced speech recognition will ensure that only one or two authorized users will be able to operate it."
New devices, such as Nokia's 9110 Communicator, a combination phone and personal digital assistant (PDA), are almost ready on the market.
But some customers feel the keyboard and screen are too small and too complex for comfort.
To get around these problems, Nokia's 7110 mobile phone has a larger screen and is operated by a tracking ball in addition to a keyboard.
The phone has a market among young people, who tend to send more text messages than they make mobile phone calls because text is less expensive.
Ericsson is researching a "smart quill" pen.
A pen appearing like any other, but permits writers to write on any surface - or even in the air - while a microchip in the tip of the pen records the shape of the scribblings and transmits them to a remote PC, where special software converts them into normal text.
Could this mean the end of typing?
Not yet.
Ericsson can not say when a prototype will be ready.
Speech recognition software might eventually make keyboards unnecessary.
The Philips Genie, a lightweight mobile phone, can be operated by uttering a single word.
When you type a name into the Genie's keypad, the system asks whether you would like to assign a voice-dial tag to that name.
Through "yes" or "No" prompts, the Genie compiles a list of up to 10 voice tags.
The next time you want to call a person listed as one of these tags, just say that person's name or a relevant code word.
Until mobile phones become more sophisticated, they will face competition from P.D.A.S. American firm Palm Computing, part of 3Com, has released its Palm VII.
Palm Computing has created a fast Internet messaging service for the Palm VII by building the Personal Query Assistant, a service allowing access to specially cut-down Internet sites which provide data such as flight schedules, sports scores, weather forecasts and news headlines.
The device will be able to handle transactions like booking cinema tickets or making online stock trades.
Similarly, CNN and Nokia have joined forces to create the first 24-hour global news hotline, CNN Mobile, which provides Global System for Mobile communications (GSM) customers with breaking news.
While some prefer mobile phones and P.D.A.S. in a single unit, Swedish manufacturer Ericsson believes that if built separately, they can offer more flexibility.
Ericsson's "advanced mobile companion," the MC218, a small communicator with a full-size keyboard, uses an infrared modem to enable e-mail, fax, short message service (SMS) messages and Internet access via any Ericsson GSM mobile phone and mobile network subscription.
Yet, to many, data transmission via mobile phones and P.D.A.S is agonizingly slow.
At present, GSM phones can transmit data only at speeds of 9.6. kilobits per second - compared with the 56 kilobits per second Web browsing capabilities found in many PC modems.
But in Europe sometime during 2000 a faster system known as General Packet Radio Services will enable mobiles to send many packets of data simultaneiously, allowing information to be transmitted at 115 kilobits per second, increasing within a few years to 384 kilobits per second.
Eventually, a common transmission system known as Universal Mobile Telecoms System (U.M.T.S.) will propel information at speeds around 2,000 kilobits per second, or 40 times faster than today's modems.
This will make possible video conferencing with excellent picture quality, fast mobile Net surfing and the transmission of e-mails with large file attachments.
But how will mobile phones communicate with other digital devices such as household appliances?
Through Bluetooth, a wireless standard that allows electronic devices to communicate over distances shorter than its 10m range.
Already accepted as a common protocol by more than 500 electronics manufacturers, Bluetooth will be installed in over 80% of mobile phones by 2001.
Soon, this technology could allow you to make adjustments to your central heating, operate your stereo or check the oil in your car via your mobile phone.
But even when U.M.T.S. becomes widely established, many nations will still have poor coverage outside main urban districts.
Satellite communications still provide the only feasible method of linking people in remote locations together.
But why not combine a surface-link phone with a satellite link?
One satellite communications provider, London-based ICO Global Communications, is already using cheap terrestrial links around urban areas, then switching instantly to satellite when the caller enters a remote area.
Images will be just as important as sound to the future of mobile communications.
At British Telecom's research laboratories near Ipswich, England, engineers are evaluating how a tiny screen fitted to the side-frame of a pair of ordinary glasses can be linked to the human eye.
Jerry Bowskill, senior research scientist at BT, recently wore just such a portable micro-PC connected to his glasses for a three-month period to experience the problems and benefits such devices might produce.
The micro-PC is carried in a shoulder bag and connected to a tiny screen in the glass frame.
The PC accepts incoming data in standard TV format via an aerial and converts it into PC format images.
The image on the screen is reflected onto the human eye via a prism fitted onto the lens.
"The image quality is excellent," says Bowskill.
"It has the same resolution as a PC desktop screen.
And even though the image is 2.5 cm away from your eye, it looks as if you're staring at a screen one meter away. "
Within a few years, he predicts, "We might all be wearing these glasses."
A person wearing such glasses could be on the move while staying tuned in to incoming TV images, websites, video conferencing links or e-mail messages.
In Germany, Siemens is developing a cordless video telephone that includes a tiny camera and a high-resolution pixel color display designed around the Digital Enhanced Cordless Telecommunication radio system.
It can transmit at around 64 kilobits - more than six times faster than current data transmission rates for mobile phones.
"This means that the videophone can send sufficient data to allow 10 frames per second," says Karlheinz Groebmainz, Siemens' Munich-based project spokesman for the cordless video telephone.
This rate would compare favorably with video tape, which operates at rates between 25 and 30 frames per second.
Using an earpiece, callers hold the phones at arm's length to maintain visual contact.
Alternatively, the phone can be pointed at something else - the Taj Mahal, for example - to allow the person on the other end to view it.
Some even suggest that mobile videophones could overtake television as the major source of visual information, giving the phrase "something to phone home about" a whole new meaning.
Can't program a computer?
Not techno savvy?
Not a problem.
If you've got a hot Internet business idea, Silicon Valley's astonishing start-up machine will do the rest.
There was something oddly charming about the geeks who made up the first wave of Internet entrepreneurs.
Social misfits pounding out code in their computer-science labs- These people deserved professional success.
During the summer of 1999, however, came the Second Wave: fast-talking business-school grads whose interest in technology is limited to how it will make them money.
This is Silicon Valley in the IPO age.
Geeks are history; they're all capitalists now.
All it takes to launch the next Internet success is a neat idea, a few connections and a lot of luck.
It's not all about the money.
If you're an eager 28-year-old business-school graduate and you believe the Internet is going to be bigger than the Industrial Revolution, why not try to become Henry Ford?
If you're an entrepreneur, why waste your time in the old world, worrying about manufacturing things when you can put your company online in three months?
Why have a boss when you and three buddies can build your own publicly traded company in two years?
Windows this big don't open that often.
That's a big reason people are flocking to the Valley, from Wall Street and Moscow and Bombay.
But mostly, it's the money.
For a few weeks now, I' ve wanted a pair of new sneakers.
I'm dreaming of a shoe that's fashionable but not club-kid trendy, maybe something high tech and modern like a Nike Air Max, or perhaps something vintage but cool like thick-striped Adidas.
I think about these sneakers when I'm watching MTV and I flip through fashion magazines.
I am convinced that these shoes will change, if not my life, certainly my attitude.
I am, quite obviously, ready to buy.
Should the right retailer match me up with the right pair of shoes, the retailer and I will both go home happy.
Could that retailer be online?
Though I have begun to suspect it is, James Twitchell doesn't think so.
Twitchell, a University of Florida professor and author of several books about American consumer culture, believes online shopping will never replace the act of buying something in a store.
Recently, as a part of his research while doing a book about luxury, Twitchell (who doesn't like off-line shopping either) managed to drag himself into the chic Ralph Lauren store on Madison Avenue in New York City.
A three-story fake mansion, the store presents not just Ralph Lauren clothes but an entire lifestyle as well.
Something strange happened to Professor Twitchell there: he wanted to buy a tie.
"There I was, running my hands through the ties.
Now, I hate this place, "Twitchell reminds me," but I felt this gasp inside me because I wanted one of those ties. "
This is why he feels the online shopping experience is simply unable to give consumers that twinge of irrational desire to make a purchase that Twitchell calls the "Buchanan moment".
This experience is named for the moment in F. Scott Fitzgerald's classic American Novel The Great Gatsby when an overwhelming flood of desire seizes heroine Daisy Buchanan when Jay Gatsby unveils to her a sensual cascade of finely made shirts.
E-shopping must satisfy some desires however.
Consumers spent $700 million online in 1996, as contrasted with $7 billion in 1988.
They're expected to spend more than twice as much during 2000, according to the technology consulting firm Jupiter Communications.
One reason for this is clear; comparison shopping has never been easier thanks to such businesses as Priceline.com and eLoan and services like mySimon that will search the Web looking for the best price.
In addition, almost anything you might want to buy is available on-line today.
But in areas in which products vary widely within a category, and decisions are based not just on price but also on, for example, how well something fits or whether it will go with those pants you just bought, online shopping is still lacking.
Which brings me back to my shoes.
It in fact brings us to the Footlocker's new web-site, the Footlocker Megastore (www.footlocker.com).
They offer me 110 different shoes to consider, and that is after I narrow my search to women's casual footwear.
The shoes and I just sort of stare at each from our separate sides of the computer screen.
It's not just that I can't feel these shoes, it's that I can't get a feel for them.
What kind of person wears these Pumas?
Would they look OK with blue jeans?
Our decisions are not entirely rational.
In the book Why We Buy, retail anthropologist Paco Underhill uses extensive studies of shoppers' behavior to prove shopping can be influenced by a variety of seemingly extraneous factors.
These influences range from the number of mirrors in a store to whether the aisles are wide enough to avoid embarrassing shopper collisions.
It is all these factors that brick and mortar stores use to convince us to buy once we are inside them.
To cover the cost of doing business they must have a "sell-through rate" of around 50%, the percentage of those who buy to those who come to look.
By contrast, the highest of any online retailer is only 7%.
E-commerce sites will have to address the problem of turning shoppers into buyers if they want to move far beyond their current niches.
That's why the next-generation online retailers are trying to figure out how to improve the process of shopping.
They're creating sites that try to reflect the feeling and experience of actually being in a store.
And they're trying to create an electronic environment that either produces a Daisy Buchanan moment or brings into existence its equivalent.
We are already seeing low-cost, modest attempts at this.
The popular site Wine.com uses e-mail and chat rooms to encourage a kind of electronic wine-tasting party.
And this past holiday season, at least two companies -LivePerson and PeopleSupport - provided many major retailers with the technology they need to give their customers instant-message-style interaction with live, online sales persons.
Even more interesting, however, is Boo.com, a sport-and-lifestyle-clothing retailer that opened its electronic doors in September, 1999.
The website features 3-D computer graphic images of product samples you could "Pick up" and turn around to examine from all angles.
Cooler still, it offered one of the first attempts at a virtual personal shopper (she's named "Ms. Boo" and "dressing rooms," where one can wrap outfits around a kind of 3-D paper doll.
Along with the actual products are news articles on popular sports athletes and snapshots of savvy twenty-year-olds from around the globe to give context to the clothes for sale.
You get a sense of not just what Boo.com has for sale but also who else besides you might be buying there.
As I sit facing a computer screen and enjoy playing with the cool 360 degree viewing rotation of several different pairs of shoes, I find that something strange happened.
I actually want to buy a pair of Converse Road Rage shoes, in lime green.
Is this the Buchanan moment?
Who knows, but - I tell myself - I really want those shoes.
Now... if I can just find them on sale.
The trouble with shopping for clothes online is that you never know if that dynamite blouse will look as good on you as it does on the skinny model.
Now Broderbund's Cosmopolitan Fashion Makeover Deluxe CD-ROM ($50) lets you enter your own measurements, hairstyle and skin color on a virtual model to see how clothes from Macy's might look on your body.
If you like what you see, simply click (on links to macys.com) and buy.
Nissan's plan to fire 221,000 workers may indicate a tough new approach in Japanese business culture
In February, 1999, Nissan Motor took the radical step of putting itself up for sale.
At that time, chief executive Yoshikazu Hanawa was asked whether he would consider breaking Japan Inc. 's long-standing taboo and fire workers to cut costs.
His answer: "We will handle the employment issue carefully."
Near the end of October, 1999, Nissan, Japan's second largest carmaker, announced that it would shut five plants, cut ties to hundreds of suppliers, and - gasp! - let go of 21,000 workers.
Hanawa's explanation: "We don't have other alternatives.
To survive, we must do this. "
Hanawa isn't the only Japanese business leader to make radical changes.
A number of high-profile corporations have said they will fire staff, shed suppliers and sell subsidiaries.
Two large banks, Sakura and Sumitomo, will merge after decades of fierce rivalry.
They announced that they will eliminate 9,300 jobs.
Such radical changes strike at traditions that many Japanese hold sacred.
These traditions include lifetime employment for all workers and the cozy networks of interlocking businesses and banks known as keiretsu.
It's too early to call this a full-scale revolution: there are still plenty of people who follow and support the old ways.
In October, 1999 Prime Minister Keizo Obuchi warned Nissan that it should think hard about the impact of its drastic cost-cutting program on workers and subcontractors.
Some suggest that Hanawa himself is a reluctant reformer.
They say that he has been forced to take action by Nissan's new partner, the French car maker, Renault.
"Only a foreigner could make such changes," says Yukio Noguchi, an economist at the University of Tokyo.
"No Japanese could solve the problem because of the keiretsu and its employees."
The chairman of rival auto-maker Toyota, Hiroshi Okuda, predicts Nissan's far-reaching plans will be difficult to accomplish.
"Companies that fire employees simply because of an economic downturn will lose the trust of workers and eventually lose the competitive edge," he told the Japanese press.
One can forgive the doubters.
Promises of reform have been made repeatedly before.
Scripts for a "new Japan" have been written and re-written.
"In Japan, everything continues for as long as it can continue," says Akio Mikuni, president of a credit-rating company.
Indeed, there are still structural obstacles to a dramatic overhaul of Japan's corporations.
Accounting systems aren't easily understood, bankruptcy laws are inadequate, the judicial process is slow.
And, astonishing as it may sound, Japan simply doesn't have enough accountants or lawyers to cope with massive corporate restructuring.
"The pace is picking up," sys Brian Rose, senior economist at Warburg Dillon Read in Tokyo.
He expects the mergers to trigger something of a domino effect.
As banks consolidate, the keiretsu will disintegrate.
Stronger companies will no longer need to rely on allied banks for capital.
Weaker firms will find themselves without banks to depend on.
If that scenario occurs, it will mean an end to ways of doing business that date back to the early part of the 20th century.
Says economist Noguchi, "The problem is, the technology changed but our system didn't."
The keiretsu face their biggest threat yet, the Internet, as manufacturers worldwide are starting to click directly on to supply routes that are fast, cheap and eliminate middle men.
In recent years, Japanese companies have repeatedly chosen to shield one another from the need to change.
The keiretsu tend to protect their money-losing businesses.
Nissan is a good example.
It has been using barely half of its manufacturing capacity and yet supporting a large network of suppliers that have little incentive to offer competitive prices.
Despite declining market share and sales, nobody dared change the system, despite its stunning inefficiencies.
Keiretsuties are extensive and touch every part of the lives of a group's employees.
At Sumitomo Bank, for example, staff are encouraged to drink only Asahi beer because the brewery is in its keiretsu.
The decline of these groups is being hastened by powerful new forces.
Foreigners are now allowed to invest in long shielded sectors of the Japanese economy, like brokerages, banks and insurance companies.
An invasion of the financial sector is also under way.
Japanese workers have need for concern.
Unemployment has reached a post-war high of 5%, and large-scale layoffs have just begun.
Some company men aren't waiting for the inevitable.
Yasufumi Takahashi, a trader in precious metals at Nissho Iwai, has enrolled in a class to study financial planning.
The trading house suffered huge losses last year, slashed salaries and announced it would cut at least 1,000 employees - nearly one fourth of its workforce - by March 2002.
Takahashi, 31, saw his income fall 20%.
He fears it might drop further and that he may even lose his job - hence the financial-planning course.
"I thought I'd work here a long time," he says.
"But there have been a lot of bankruptcies, mergers and acquisitions, foreign investors coming in.
The situation in Japan has to change. "
At Nissan, it already has.
